Hawaii statutes.
[§571-56] Offense. A person who makes
a false statement which the person does not believe to be true commits an
offense whether the false statement is made under an oath required or
authorized by law or under "penalty of perjury" as authorized by
section 571-55. [L 1970, c 17, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next